Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,253
Equine activities; signs and contracts; requirements.

(1) Every equine professional shall post and maintain signs which contain the following warning notice:

WARNING

Under Nebraska Law, an equine professional is not liable for an injury to or the death of a participant in equine activities resulting from the inherent risks of equine activities, pursuant to sections 25-21,249 to 25-21,253.

The warning notice signs shall be placed in a clearly visible location on or near stables, corrals, or arenas where the equine professional conducts equine activities if such stables, corrals, or arenas are owned, leased, rented, managed, or controlled by the equine professional. The placement of warning notice signs shall be such that they may be readily seen by participants in equine activities. The warning notice signs shall have black letters with each letter of the word "WARNING" a minimum of three inches in height and the rest of the letters a minimum of one inch in height.

(2) Every written contract entered into by an equine professional for providing professional services, instruction, or rental of equipment or tack or an equine to a participant, whether or not the contract involves equine activities on or off the location or site of the equine professional's business, shall contain in clearly readable print the warning notice specified in subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1997, LB 153, § 5;

Laws 2002, LB 684, § 1.